California, session 20252026, AB1182.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25302.8 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25302.8. The commission shall prepare and submit a report, on or before July 1, 2026, to the Governor and the Legislature regarding the status of electrical transmission and distribution grid infrastructure manufacturing in this state, including the manufacturing of substation transformers, transmission lines, and other related equipment.(b) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2030.